Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3424
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act are to:

(1) Create a legislative framework for establishing county-level, multidisciplinary overdose fatality review teams in Nebraska;

(2) Provide overdose fatality review teams with duties and responsibilities to examine and understand the circumstances leading up to overdoses so that the teams can make recommendations on policy changes and resource allocation to prevent future overdoses; and

(3) Allow overdose fatality review teams to obtain and review records and other documentation related to overdoses from relevant agencies, entities, and individuals while remaining compliant with local, state, and federal confidentiality laws and regulations.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 81.